Massachusetts, session 194th, H1052.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18 of chapter 91 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fifth paragraph, the following
paragraph:
No license or permit shall be required for dredge or fill, as defined by the department, as
part of work to restore tidelands, including salt marshes; provided that such a project is permitted
by the department or local issuing authority pursuant to section 40 of chapter 131 and applicable
regulations; and provided further, that such a project does not impair public access or navigation
and does not involve placement of a structure.
SECTION 2. Section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the twenty-seventh paragraph the following paragraph:
The notice of intention required in the first paragraph of this section shall not apply to
targeted hand removal of invasive, non-native plants from resource areas. The department shall
of 3

issue regulations on the scope and methods for such invasives removal, including standards to
minimize disturbance to soils and native plants and wildlife, requirements for notification to
conservation commissions, and the competency of individuals performing such work.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the secretary of
energy and environmental affairs shall undertake a Wetlands Restoration Streamlining Initiative
to improve the efficiency and reduce permitting and monitoring costs for ecological restoration
projects as defined in 310 CMR 10.04. This initiative shall include a review of laws and
regulations governing projects in wetlands or waterways including, but not limited to, those
overseen by the environmental policy act office, department of environmental protection, office
of coastal zone management, division of fisheries and wildlife, natural heritage and endangered
species program, division of marine fisheries, and division of ecological restoration. The review
shall solicit input from experts and restoration practitioners. Not later than 12 months following
the passage of this act, the secretary shall issue a report with recommendations for legislative and
regulatory amendments to reduce the time, complexity, and costs of permitting ecological
restoration projects, and maintaining important habitat.
SECTION 4. (a) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall establish
a pilot program for research activities and demonstration projects for nature-based solutions, as
defined in section 1 of chapter 21N of the General Laws. The program shall: (i) define categories
of nature-based solutions and develop standards for their use; (ii) coordinate, streamline and
expedite the permitting and review process for activities and projects; and (iii) prioritize
activities and projects that advance scientific knowledge, provide conservation benefits, and
minimize impacts to existing wetlands. The secretary of energy and environmental affairs and
of 3

commissioners/directors of permitting agencies may modify specific performance standards for
nature-based solutions.
(b) The pilot program shall commence upon the effective date of this Act and operate for
5 years. Not later than one year from the effective date of this Act, and annually thereafter, the
secretary shall file a report with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the joint
committee on environment and natural resources that: (i) details the categories of nature-based
solutions; (ii) analyzes the approval time for all permits required for each approved research
activity or demonstration project; (iii) specifies any specific performance standards modified for
each approved research activity or project; and (iv) provides data about the effectiveness of each
approved research activity or project.
of 3